Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-522 Maintenance and destruction of
records. (a) The filing office shall maintain a record of the information
provided in a filed financing statement for at least one year after the
effectiveness of the financing statement has lapsed under section 490:9-515
with respect to all secured parties of record. The record must be retrievable
by using the name of the debtor and by using the file number assigned to the
initial financing statement to which the record relates.

(b) Except to the extent that a statute
governing disposition of public records provides otherwise, the filing office
immediately may destroy any written record evidencing a financing statement.
However, if the filing office destroys a written record, it shall maintain
another record of the financing statement which complies with subsection (a).
[L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next